Maryland, session 2025, SB0175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
19–108.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, TRANSFER, OR DISTRIBUTE
NONCONDUCTIVE NON–ARC–RESISTANT JACKETED CORRUGATED STAINLESS STEEL
TUBING THAT:
(1) DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE LC1027 STANDARD
DESCRIBED IN THE MOST RECENT EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL FUEL AND GAS
CODE ISSUED BY THE INTERNATIONAL CODE COUNCIL; OR
(2) HAS NOT BEEN PROVEN TO WITHSTAND AT LEAST 36 COULOMBS
OF ELECTRICAL ARCING CHARGE BY AN ELECTRICAL ARCING TEST.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
Article – Public Safety
12–206.
(a) This section applies to any building that uses fuel gas piping systems not
subject to Title 49, Part 192 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
(b) [Non–arc–resistant jacketed] ONLY NONCONDUCTIVE JACKETED
corrugated stainless steel tubing THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE LC1027
STANDARD DESCRIBED IN THE MOST RECENT EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL

SENATE BILL 175 3
FUEL AND GAS CODE ISSUED BY THE INTERNATIONAL CODE COUNCIL OR HAS BEEN
PROVEN TO WITHSTAND AT LEAST 36 COULOMBS OF ELECTRICAL ARCING CHARGE
BY AN ELECTRICAL ARCING TEST may [not] be used in:
(1) the new construction of a customer–owned natural gas or liquefied
propane piping system in a building;
(2) a natural gas or liquefied propane piping system in a renovated
property if the renovation affects more than 50% of the total square footage of the property;
or
(3) a natural gas or liquefied propane piping system that requires the
addition of a new gas line to the gas piping system.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Labor and the Office of the State Fire Marshal,
in collaboration with the State Fire Prevention Commission, the State Fire Marshal, and
local inspectors, shall conduct a study the and make recommendations related to prevention
of preventing the fire hazards associated with commonly used corrugated stainless steel
tubing and other fuel gas piping systems, including gas piping and corrugated stainless
steel tubing, in residential and commercial buildings.
(b) The Maryland Department of Labor In conducting the study and making the
recommendations, the Department and the Office shall:
(1) study and compare the fire hazards created by hazard risks of different
types of corrugated stainless steel tubing in comparison to other fuel fuel gas piping
systems, including gas piping systems used in residential buildings and corrugated
stainless steel tubing;
(2) study the likelihood of corrugated stainless steel tubing or other fuel
fuel gas piping systems, including gas piping systems and corrugated stainless steel tubing,
causing a fire in a residential or commercial building following a direct or indirect lightning
strike;
(3) make recommendations regarding the analyze the effectiveness of
existing standards and requirements necessary for corrugated stainless steel tubing and
other in the State related to fuel gas piping systems to prevent or minimize the risk of fire
in residential or commercial buildings, including regulatory or legislative measures,
including gas piping and corrugated stainless steel tubing, and identify areas for
improvement;

SENATE BILL 175
(4) make recommendations regarding any standards and requirements
necessary to address aggravating factors that may reasonably contribute to the failure or
malfunctioning of corrugated stainless steel tubing or other analyze and identify the best
practices for state and local legislative, regulatory, and building code standards for fuel gas
piping systems, such as improper installation, maintenance, or grounding including gas
piping and corrugated stainless steel tubing;
(5) assess the availability of testing facilities to determine whether
corrugated stainless steel tubing and other fuel gas piping systems are able to withstand
lightning strikes or electrical arcing; identify potential legislative or regulatory changes in
the State to prevent or minimize the fire hazards associated with fuel gas piping systems,
including gas piping and corrugated stainless steel tubing, § 12–206 of the Public Safety
Article, and if enacted by S.B. 175 or H.B. 222 of 2025, § 19–108 of the Business Regulation
Article;
(6) determine what industry standards or requirements are necessary to
prevent or minimize the fire hazards associated with fuel gas piping systems, including gas
piping and corrugated stainless steel tubing;
(7) determine what standards or requirements are necessary, if any, to
address aggravating factors that may reasonably contribute to the failure or malfunctioning
of fuel gas piping systems, including gas piping and corrugated stainless steel tubing, and
create a fire hazard, such as improper installation or grounding;
(8) assess the prevalence of non–arc–resistant jacketed corrugated stainless
steel tubing in residential and commercial buildings and the fire hazards that this presents;
and
(6) (9) assess the feasibility of implementing the standards and requirements
recommended under items (3) and (4) of this subsection;
(7) analyze the prevalence of nonconductive jacketed corrugated stainless
steel tubing in residential and commercial buildings and the fire hazard presented; and
(8) consult with the following individuals or entities regarding items (1)
through (7) of this subsection:
(i) identified in this study.
(c) In carrying out the study, the Department and the Office shall consult with:
(1) the State Fire Prevention Commission;
(2) local government entities that conduct responsible for residential or
commercial gas fitting inspections or permitting;
(ii) the State Fire Marshal; and

SENATE BILL 175 5
(iii) any other necessary subject matter experts; and
(3) manufacturers of fuel gas piping systems and corrugated stainless steel
tubing.
(c) (d) (1) On or before December 1, 2025, the Maryland Department of Labor
Department and the Office shall submit an interim report of its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment
and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
(2) On or before September 30 1, 2026, the Maryland Department of Labor
Department and the Office shall submit a final report of its findings and recommendations
to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2027 June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.